Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1744.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(b.1) Reconsideration of sentence.--(1) A person convicted of murder of the second degree shall be eligible for consideration for parole after serving 25 years of the term of imprisonment if the person has no felony convictions during the prior 25 years and does not have any pending felony charges. A conviction resulting from the same criminal episode as the subject conviction of murder of the second degree shall not be considered.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) The eligibility for parole under paragraph (1) shall not apply to a violation of or sentences imposed under section 1102.1, 2704 (relating to assault by life prisoner), 3301(a), (a.1) and (a.2) (relating to arson and related offenses) or 4952(b) (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).(3) This subsection shall only apply to a person who was not the principal in the perpetuation of the felony of the second degree. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "principal" shall mean the same as defined under section 2502(d) (relating to murder).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1744PN2150 - 2 - 12345678910111213